Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2465
Personal representative to proceed without court order; exception.

A personal representative shall proceed expeditiously with the settlement and distribution of a decedent's estate and, except as otherwise specified or ordered in regard to a supervised personal representative, do so without adjudication, order, or direction of the court, but he may invoke the jurisdiction of the court, in proceedings authorized by this code, to resolve questions concerning the estate or its administration.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 143, UPC § 3-704.